Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0098.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 3m. (1) A temporary door locking device or system may be installed in a child care center in accordance with section 4i of the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1504i. (2) As used in this section, temporary door locking device or system means that term as defined in section 4i of the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1504i. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 96. (b) Senate Bill No. 97. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor